District of Columbia statutes.
38-1207.02

Criteria for tuition grant eligibility.

Subject to the limitations provided in §§ 38-1207.03 and 38-1207.05, the University shall admit an eligible parent, a caretaker relative, or a legal guardian, who shall have been certified as eligible by the District of Columbia Department of Human Services, to any scheduled course and shall provide a tuition grant that shall be used exclusively to offset against the charge for tuition and required fees for the eligible student taking 1 or more courses, whether or not taken for credit toward a degree, when the course or courses are being given, when space is available, and when the conditions for enrollment in the course are met.

History

Oct. 26, 1974, Pub. L. 93-471, title VII, § 702
as added Feb. 18, 1988, D.C. Law 7-74, § 2, 34 DCR 7946

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-1207.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1572.